Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; PROJECT REVIEW; TRUNK HIGHWAY 210.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $5,400,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for environmental analysis, predesign, design, right-of-way acquisition, and construction of safety and mobility improvements along marked Trunk Highway 210 between Aurdal Township and Nidaros Township in Otter Tail County, including consultant usage to support these activities and the cost of payments to landowners for lands acquired for highway rights-of-way. The commissioner may use up to 17 percent of this amount for project delivery. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Project Review. new text end new text begin Prior to expending funds from this appropriation for the project under subdivision 1, the commissioner must submit to the Otter Tail County Board of Commissioners a final layout and project report covering the purpose, route location, and proposed design of the project. The supporting data must include a good-faith cost estimate of all the costs in which Otter Tail County is expected to participate. Within 90 days of receiving the layout, report, and cost estimate, the board must approve or disapprove the proposed project in writing. If the board disapproves the final layout, the commissioner may make modifications requested by the county or decide not to proceed with the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget must sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $5,400,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end